Utah statutes.
17-21-17.   Prohibited acts.

(1)  Upon acceptance of an instrument entitled to be recorded, the recorder may not:

(a)  record the instrument in any manner other than the manner required by this chapter; or

(b)  alter, change, obliterate, or insert any new matter in any instrument of record.

(2)  A recorder does not violate this section by:

(a)  denying access to:

(i)  an instrument of record that has been classified as private under Section 63G-2-302; or

(ii)  a portion of an instrument of record that has been classified as private under Section 63G-2-302; or

(b)  placing an endorsement, reference, or other note on a document in the course of the recorder's work.

